Washington statutes.
RCW 36.34.090

Notice of sale.

(1) Whenever county property is to be sold at public auction, consignment auction, or sealed bid, the county treasurer or the county treasurer's designee must:

(a) Publish notice of the sale once during each of two successive calendar weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the county;

(b) Post notice of the sale in a conspicuous place in the county courthouse; and

(c) If a public auction sale by electronic media will be conducted pursuant to RCW 36.16.145, post notice of the sale on the county's internet website.

(2) The posting and date of first publication must be at least ten days before the day fixed for the sale.

[ 2015 c 95 s 6; 1997 c 393 s 5; 1991 c 363 s 69; 1985 c 469 s 46; 1963 c 4 s 36.34.090. Prior: 1945 c 254 s 8; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 4014-8; prior: 1891 c 76 s 4, part; RRS s 4010, part.]

NOTES:

Intent—2015 c 95: See note following RCW 36.16.145.

Purpose—Captions not law—1991 c 363: See notes following RCW 2.32.180.